California statutes. Education Code
It is the intent of the Legislature that the 21st Century Community Learning Centers program contained within the federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001 (Public Law 107-110) complement the After School Education and Safety Program established by Article 22.5 (commencing with Section 8482) to provide year-round opportunities for expanded learning, as defined in Section 8482.1, and to support the local flexibility needed to implement federal 21st Century Community Learning Centers programs through after school grants as specified in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 370, Sec. 21.   (SB 1221)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8484.75.

The requirements of the After School Education and Safety Program described in Article 22.5 (commencing with Section 8482) apply to the program established by this article, with the following exceptions as applicable:

(a) Sections 8482.5, 8482.55, 8483.5, 8483.55, 8483.6, 8483.7, 8483.75, and 8484.5 do not apply to this article.

(b) Any provision of Article 22.5 (commencing with Section 8482) that is in conflict with, or duplicative of, any provision of this article.

(c) Any provision that is in conflict with applicable federal law or regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 89.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

8484.8.

In accordance with Part B of Title IV of the federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001 (Public Law 107-110), funds appropriated in Item 6110-197-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2002 are available for expenditure as follows, with any subsequent allocations for these purposes to be determined in the annual Budget Act:

(a) Beginning with the 2006–07 fiscal year, 5 percent of the federal funds appropriated through this article shall be available to the department for purposes of providing technical assistance, evaluation, and training services, and for contracting for local technical assistance, for carrying out programs related to 21st Century Community Learning Centers programs.

(1) The department shall provide
 directly, or contract for, technical assistance for new programs and any program that is not meeting attendance or performance goals, or both, and requests that assistance.

(2) (A) Training and support shall include, but is not limited to, the development and distribution of voluntary guidelines for physical activity programs established pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 8482.3, that expand the learning opportunities of the schoolday.

(B) The department shall distribute these voluntary guidelines for physical activity programs on or before July 1, 2009.

(3) In accordance with Part B of Title IV of the federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001 (Public Law 107-110), funding for programs that promote parent involvement and family literacy are an allowable
 use of these funds.

(b) (1) At least 5 percent of the total amount appropriated pursuant to this article, after funds have been allocated pursuant to subdivision (a), shall be available for grants to provide equitable access and participation in community learning center programs, in an amount not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per site, per year, according to needs determined by the local community.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), the department shall determine the requirements for eligibility for a grant, consistent with the following:

(A) Consistent with the local partnership approach inherent in Article 22.5 (commencing with Section 8482), grants awarded under this subdivision shall provide supplemental assistance to programs. It is not intended that a grant fund the
 full anticipated costs of the services provided by a community learning center program.

(B) In determining the need for a grant pursuant to this subdivision, the department shall base its determination on a needs assessment and a determination that existing resources are not available to meet these needs, including, but not limited to, a description of how the needs, strengths, and resources of the community have been assessed, currently available resources, and the justification for additional resources for that purpose.

(C) The department shall award grants for a specific purpose, as justified by the applicant.

(3) To be eligible to receive a grant under this subdivision, the designated public agency representative for the applicant shall certify that an annual fiscal audit will be conducted and that adequate,
 accurate records will be kept. In addition, each applicant shall provide the department with the assurance that funds received under this subdivision are expended only for those services and supports for which they are granted. The department shall require grant recipients to submit annual budget reports, and the department may withhold funds in subsequent years if after school grant funds are expended for purposes other than as awarded.

(4) The department shall require grant recipients to submit quarterly expenditure reports, and the department may withhold funds in subsequent years if access or literacy grant funds are expended for purposes other than as granted.

(c) At least 50 percent of the total amount appropriated pursuant to this article, after funds have been allocated pursuant to subdivision (a), shall be allocated on a priority basis for after school grants to community
 learning centers serving high school pupils funded pursuant to Section 8421. The department shall allocate funds to each geographic region described in subdivision (a) of Section 8423 by the regional percentage of statewide pupils who are eligible for free or reduced-price meals reported to the department for the immediately preceding fiscal year. Each region’s percentage shall be determined by dividing the region’s number of pupils eligible for free or reduced-price meals by the statewide number of pupils eligible for free or reduced-price meals.

(d) Grant awards under this section shall be restricted to those applications that propose primarily to serve pupils that attend schoolwide programs, as described in Title I of the federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001 (Public Law 107-110). Competitive priority shall be given to applications that propose to serve pupils in schools designated as being in need of improvement under subsection (b) of
 Section 6316 of Title 20 of the United States Code, and that are jointly submitted by school districts and community-based organizations.

(e) (1) Up to 40 percent of the total amount appropriated pursuant to this article, after funds have been allocated pursuant to subdivision (a), shall be allocated to programs serving elementary and middle school pupils and receiving funds pursuant to the Community Schools Partnership Act (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 8900)). The department shall allocate funds to each geographic region
 described in subdivision (k) by the regional percentage of statewide pupils who are eligible for free or reduced-price meals reported to the department for the immediately preceding fiscal year. Each region’s percentage shall be determined by dividing the region’s number of pupils eligible for free or reduced-price meals by the statewide number of pupils eligible for free or reduced-price meals. The administrators of a program established pursuant to this article may operate during regular schooldays for a minimum of 15 hours per week and any combination of summer, intersession, or vacation periods for a minimum of three hours per day for the regular school year pursuant to Section 8483.7. Grantees administering comprehensive programs established pursuant to Section 8482.3 are also eligible for funding for summer, intersession, or vacation periods pursuant to this section.

(2) After school and summer funding grants for programs serving middle
 and elementary school pupils shall be allocated according to the same funding provisions, and subject to the same reporting and accountability provisions, as described in Sections 8483.7 and 8483.75.

(3) (A) Priority shall be given to grant applications that will provide year-round expanded learning programming, including programs that complement existing funded programs. Year-round expanded learning programs are defined as any combination of an applicant that provides year-round programming, an applicant that offers summer programming to complement existing after school programs, or an applicant that offers after school programs to complement existing summer programs. The applicant is not required to be the same entity that operates the existing program, but shall identify the grantee with whom the applicant is
 coordinating for the purpose of providing year-round programming.

(B) Priority shall be given to grant applications that will provide expanded learning programs on schoolsites not receiving funds for expanded learning opportunity programs provided pursuant to Section 46120.

(4) (A) Funding for a grant shall be allocated in annual increments for a period not to exceed five years, subject to annual reporting and recertification as required by the department. The department shall establish a payment system to accommodate upfront payments. The department shall notify new grantees, whose grant awards are contingent upon the appropriation of funds for those grants, in writing no later than May 15 of each year in which new grants are awarded. A first-year
 grant award shall be made no later than 60 days after enactment of the annual Budget Act and any authorizing legislation. A grant award for the second and subsequent fiscal years shall be made no later than 30 days after enactment of the annual Budget Act and any authorizing legislation. The grantee shall notify the department in writing of its acceptance of the grant.

(B) For the first year of a grant, the department shall allocate 25 percent of the grant for that year no later than 30 days after the grantee accepts the grant. For the second and subsequent years of the grant, the department shall allocate 25 percent of the grant for that year no later than 30 days after the annual Budget Act becomes effective. The grantee shall not use more than 15 percent of an annual grant award for administrative costs.

(C) In addition to the funding allowed for administrative costs under
 subparagraph (B), up to 15 percent of the initial annual grant award for each after school grant recipient may be used for startup costs.

(D) Under no circumstance shall funding made available pursuant to subparagraphs (B) and (C) result in an increase in the total funding of a grantee above the approved grant amount.

(5) A grantee shall identify the federal, state, and local programs that will be combined or coordinated with the proposed program for the most effective use of public resources, and shall prepare a plan for continuing the program beyond federal grant funding.

(6) A grantee shall submit semiannual attendance data and results to facilitate evaluation and compliance in accordance with provisions established by the department.

(7) A program
 receiving a grant under this subdivision is not assured of grant renewal from future state or federal funding at the conclusion of the grant period. However, priority for funding pursuant to this subdivision shall be given to programs with expiring grants, if those programs have satisfactorily met projected pupil outcomes pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 8484.

(8) Funds awarded pursuant this article shall not supplant funding used to meet the minimum offer and access requirements of the Expanded Learning Opportunities Program established pursuant to Section 46120. Grantees may, to the extent consistent with the requirements of this article, use funds awarded pursuant to this article to provide expanded learning services and supports that exceed the minimum requirements of Section 46120, including, but not limited to, serving additional pupils, extending
 program offerings, or enhancing program quality beyond the baseline services required pursuant to Section 46120.

(f) A total annual grant award for after school funding and grants for a site serving elementary or middle school pupils shall be fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per year or more, consistent with federal requirements.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, and contingent upon the availability of funding, the department may adjust the after school grant cap of any grantee based upon one or both of the following:

(1) Amendments made to this section by Chapter 555 of the Statutes of 2005.

(2) The demonstrated pupil attendance pattern of the grantee. The department may adjust grant awards pursuant to subparagraph (A) of
 paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 8483.7.

(h) Funds received but unexpended under this article may be carried forward to subsequent years consistent with federal requirements. In year one, the full grant may be retained.

(i) If funds remain after all of the priority allocations required pursuant to subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (e) have been made, the department may use that money to fund additional qualified grant applications under subdivision (c), in order to ensure that all federal funds received for these purposes are expended for these purposes. If funds remain after additional qualified grant applications are approved for funding pursuant to subdivision (c), the department may award the remaining funds for additional qualified grant applications pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (e).

(j) In any
 fiscal year in which the total state appropriation for that fiscal year exceeds the total state appropriation for the 2008–09 fiscal year after funds have been allocated pursuant to subdivision (a), the excess amount shall be allocated on a priority basis for after school grants to community learning centers funded pursuant to Section 8421 as follows:

(1) Thirty-five percent to community learning centers serving high school pupils.

(2) Fifty percent to community learning centers serving elementary and middle school pupils.

(3) Fifteen percent to summer programs serving elementary and middle school pupils.

(k) (1) To the extent possible, the selection of applicants by the department pursuant to this article shall result in an
 equitable distribution of grant awards to applicants in northern, southern, and central California, and in urban and rural areas of the state.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(A) “Central California” means California County Superintendents Educational Services Association regions five to eight, inclusive.

(B) “Northern California” means California County Superintendents Educational Services Association regions one to four, inclusive.

(C) “Southern California” means California County Superintendents Educational Services Association regions 9 to 11, inclusive.

(D) “Urban and rural areas” shall be as defined by the United States Census
 Bureau.

(l) This article shall be operative only to the extent that federal funds are made available for the purposes of this article. It is the intent of the Legislature that this article not be considered a precedent for general fund augmentation of either the state administered, federally funded program of this article, or any other state funded before or after school program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 15.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8484.9.

(a) There is hereby established in the department an Advisory Committee on Before and After School Programs for the purpose of providing information and advice to the Superintendent and the state board regarding state and federal policy and funding issues affecting before and after school programs, based on regular and systematic input from providers.

(b) The membership of the advisory committee shall consist of all of the following persons, the majority of whom shall be operators of before or after school programs:

(1) Six persons appointed by the Governor as follows:

(A) Two persons who operate an urban before or after school program.

(B) Two persons who operate a rural before or after school program.

(C) One person from a private foundation or a postsecondary academic institution.

(D) One person representing a unified school district.

(2) Two persons appointed by the Superintendent as follows:

(A) One person who operates a high school after school program.

(B) One person from a private foundation or a postsecondary academic institution.

(3) Two persons appointed by
 the Senate Committee on Rules as follows:

(A) One person who operates a small elementary after school program.

(B) One person who operates a large middle school after school program.

(4) Two persons appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly as follows:

(A) One person who operates a large elementary school after school program.

(B) One person who operates a small middle school after school program.

(5) The president of the state board or his or her designee.

(c) The advisory committee membership shall be representative of the diversity of before and after school
 programs, regarding geography, size, and public or nonpublic operation.

(d) The advisory committee members shall select one of its members to be the chair of the committee. It is the responsibility of the chair to act as the conduit between the advisory committee and the Superintendent, the state board, and appropriate staff.

(e) The advisory committee shall nominate, and the state board shall confirm, a staff member to serve as consultant to the advisory committee.

(f) The advisory committee shall meet as frequently as necessary but at least three times each year. The meetings of the committee may be conducted by teleconference.

(g) The members of the advisory committee shall serve without compensation, including for travel and per diem expenses.

(h) The advisory committee shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide information on the status of funding provided for before and after school programs in each fiscal year, including the number of applications received, the number of applications funded, and the amount and timing of committed funding.

(2) Provide recommendations on legislative and administrative action needed to ensure that funding for before and after school programs is allocated promptly to qualified providers of before and after school programs.

(3) Provide information on the quality of services and accountability measures.

(4) Provide information regarding challenges faced by before and after school programs that impede
 the provision of best possible services.

(5) Make recommendations to the department on reporting requirements for high school programs operating pursuant to Section 8421 and for program evaluation and review pursuant to Sections 8427 and 8484. The advisory committee shall provide initial recommendations to the department, and shall provide a copy to the Legislature, on or before March 1, 2007.

(6) Provide recommendations on the statewide evaluation design and outcome measures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 347, Sec. 7.   (SB 942)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 23. Child Supervision Programs [8485. - 8488.]

8485.

The governing board of any school district conducting instruction for pupils in any grade level up to, and including, the completion of junior high school, may establish a program of affordably priced supervision for children before and after school.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8480 (as added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1440) by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1120, Sec. 11.   Effective September 25, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

8486.

Child supervision programs conducted pursuant to this article shall be licensed or exempt programs administered and monitored by the school district. Programs may be staffed by district personnel or may be subcontracted to qualified private or nonprofit agencies, or to other public agencies. Each program shall be designed by administrators of the district to fit the needs at each school or site where a program is conducted.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8481 (as added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1440) by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1120, Sec. 12.   Effective September 25, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

8487.

Child supervision programs conducted pursuant to this article shall consist of supervised activities including, but not limited to, arts and crafts, sports, quiet games, playground time and snacks, and homework. Computer training may also be made available. Extra enrichment programs and study trips may be made available for a fee that shall be paid by the children’s parents or guardians.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8482 by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1120, Sec. 13.   Effective September 25, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

8488.

Each school that elects to establish a child supervision program shall apply to the State Department of Education for a grant for each program of up to four thousand dollars ($4,000). Grants for the new programs established pursuant to this section shall be allocated to programs that meet both of the following requirements:

(a) Have conducted a needs assessment of the local community.

(b) Provide for a viable program plan.

The grants may be used for any of the following: one month’s staffing cost, snacks, and the purchase of sports equipment, games, computers, and supplies as indicated by the budget submitted by the district. Once the program is operating, the district shall maintain the program through the fees charged the parents and guardians of the children in the program. The fee may be the same for each child regardless of family income or the number of hours a child participates in the program so that the self-supporting nature of the program is assured. School programs shall seek funding from local business, community, and philanthropic organizations to ensure that no needy child who desires to participate shall be denied the opportunity to participate because of inability to pay the fee. No one who desires to participate in the program shall be denied the opportunity to participate because of inability to pay the fee. The state department shall fund up to 250 programs.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8483 by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1120, Sec. 14.   Effective September 25, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 24. Expulsion and Suspension Procedures in Childcare and Development Services Programs [8489. - 8489.1.]

8489.

For purposes of this article, the following terms shall apply:

(a) “Expulsion” means the permanent dismissal of a child from a program in response to a child’s behavior.

(b) “Licensed family childcare provider” means a childcare provider who participates in a state-funded early care and education program, and is an individual who operates a family daycare home, as defined in Section 1596.78 of the Health and Safety Code, and is licensed pursuant to the requirement in Section 1596.80 of the Health and Safety Code. 

(c) “Program” means a California State Preschool program described in subdivision (w) of Section 8205 or family childcare home
 education network programs described in subdivision (k) of Section 8205 that serves children from zero to five years of age, inclusive.

(d) “Suspension” means any removal of a child from all or part of the program day, or the prevention of a child from attending the program for one or more days, in response to the child’s behavior.

(e) “Persistent and serious behaviors” means either repeated patterns of behavior that significantly interfere with the learning of other children, or interactions with peers and adults that are not responsive to the use of developmentally appropriate guidance. This includes, but is not limited to, physical aggression, property destruction, and self-injury.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 915, Sec. 4.   (AB 2806)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

8489.1.

(a) (1) Except as authorized by paragraph (3), a program shall not do either of the following:

(A) Expel or unenroll a child because of a child’s behavior.

(B) Persuade or encourage a child’s parents or legal guardians to voluntarily unenroll from the program due to a child’s behavior.

(2) (A) If a child exhibits persistent and serious behaviors, the program shall expeditiously pursue and document reasonable steps, including, but not limited to, consulting with the child’s parents or legal guardians and teacher, and, if available, engaging an early childhood mental health consultant, to
 maintain the child’s safe participation in the program. The program shall inform the parents or legal guardians of a child exhibiting persistent and serious behaviors of the process described in this section in writing, including a description of the behaviors and the program’s plan for maintaining the child’s safe participation in the program.

(B) (i) If the child has an individualized family service plan or individualized education program, the program, with written parental consent, shall contact the agency responsible for the individualized family service plan or individualized education program to seek consultation on serving the child.

(ii) The program shall consider, if appropriate, completing a comprehensive screening to identify the needs of the child, including, but not limited to, screening the child’s social and emotional development, referring
 the child’s parents or legal guardians to community resources, and implementing behavior supports within the program.

(3) If a program has expeditiously pursued and documented reasonable steps to maintain the child’s safe participation in the program and determines, in consultation with the parents or legal guardians of the child, the child’s teacher, and, if applicable, the local agency responsible for implementing the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), that the child’s continued enrollment would present a serious safety threat to the child or other enrolled children, it shall refer the parents or legal guardians to other potentially appropriate placements, the local childcare resource and referral agency, or other referral service available in the local community, and, to the greatest extent possible, support direct transition to a more appropriate placement. The program may then unenroll the
 child.

(4) A program shall have up to 180 days to complete the process described in paragraphs (2) and (3).

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2), (3), and (4), a program shall not do either of the following:

(A) Suspend a child due to a child’s behavior.

(B) Encourage or persuade a child’s parents or legal guardians to prematurely pick up a child due to a child’s behavior before the program day ends.

(2) Suspension shall only be used as a last resort in extraordinary circumstances when there is a serious safety threat that cannot be reduced or eliminated without removal. To the greatest extent possible, a program shall endeavor to ensure the full participation
 of enrolled children in all program activities.

(3) Before a program determines that suspension is necessary, the program shall collaborate with the child’s parents or legal guardians and use appropriate community resources, as needed, to determine no other reasonable option is appropriate, and provide written notice to the child’s parents or legal guardians pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (c).

(4) If suspension is deemed necessary, a program shall help the child return to full participation in all program activities as quickly as possible while ensuring child safety by doing all of the following:

(A) Continuing to engage with the parents or legal guardians and continuing to use appropriate community resources.

(B) Developing a written plan to
 document the action and supports needed.

(C) Providing referrals to appropriate community services.

(D) If the child has an individualized family service plan or individualized education program, the program, with written parental consent, shall contact the agency responsible for the individualized family service plan or individualized education program to seek consultation on serving the child.

(c) (1) The State Department of Education shall, commencing July 1, 2023, include in each contract for service with a program the limitations on expulsion and suspension provided in this section.

(2) Commencing July 1, 2023, upon enrollment of a child, a program shall notify the child’s parents or legal guardians of the limitations on
 disenrollment, including expulsion and suspension provided in this section. This notification shall be in writing and shall inform parents on how they may file an appeal to the department in the event of the expulsion or suspension of a child.

(3) Commencing July 1, 2023, in the event a program suspends or expels a child pursuant to this section, the program shall issue the child’s parent or guardian a written “Notice of Action, Recipient of Services,” as described in Section 17783 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, with the exception that the effective date of the action may be no less than 24 hours after service of the notice. The agency shall, at the same time, inform the parent or guardian in writing of their right to file an appeal of the action directly with the department no later than 14 calendar days after receipt of the notice. Because the action to suspend or expel a child involves persistent and serious behaviors that
 impact the safety of children, the action shall not be stayed during the pendency of any appeal.

(d) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and Section 33308.5, until regulations are filed with the Secretary of State, the State Department of Education shall, in consultation with the State Department of Social Services, on or before December 31, 2023, issue guidance through management bulletins or similar letters of instruction for programs on implementing the requirements set forth in this article.

(e) A program shall maintain records on, and, beginning on July 1, 2030, and subject to an appropriation by the Legislature for this purpose, the State Department of Education shall annually collect from contracting agencies, all of the following
 information:

(1) The number of times the process described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) was initiated during a program year, and the outcome of each reported instance.

(2) The number of times the process described in paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (b) was initiated during a program year, and the outcome of each reported instance, including, if applicable, how long a child was excluded from the program.

(3) The data collected pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) shall include for each child, at a minimum, age, sex, race and ethnicity, foster status, home language, disability, and whether the child has an individualized family service plan or an individualized education program.

(f) (1) Subject to an appropriation by the
 Legislature for this purpose, no later than January 1, 2031, and annually thereafter, the State Department of Education shall publish aggregate data on how many times during the most recent program year the processes described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) and paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (b) were initiated and the outcomes of the processes, disaggregated by student demographic, as required, and how many appeals or complaints the State Department of Education received from parents or legal guardians regarding expulsion and suspension. The data shall be made available at a statewide and countywide level and shall be disaggregated by age, sex, race and ethnicity, foster status, home language, disability, and assignment of an individualized family service plan or individualized education program, as applicable, pursuant to all applicable federal and state privacy protections.

(2) Data collection pursuant to subdivision (e), and
 reporting pursuant to this subdivision, by the State Department of Education shall, to the greatest extent possible, be undertaken within the framework of the department’s existing data systems.

(g) The State Department of Education shall create guidelines for offering additional support and requiring additional staff training for programs with exceptionally high numbers of suspension and expulsion reported pursuant to this section.

(h) (1) This section shall not apply to licensed family childcare providers until the joint labor-management committee established pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 10424.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code makes recommendations for potential changes related to suspensions and expulsions.

(2) Within 10 calendar days of the committee
 recommendations being completed, the State Department of Social Services and State Department of Education shall provide the committee recommendations to the Senate Health and Human Services budget subcommittees, Assembly and Senate Education budget subcommittees, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 193, Sec. 5.   (SB 140)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 24. Identification of Developmental Delays and Learning Disabilities [8490. - 8490.]

8490.

(a) Of the funds appropriated in Item 6100-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2022, two million dollars ($2,000,000) shall be allocated to the department to develop a process and tools for early identification of children at risk for developmental delays or learning disabilities. The funding in the Budget Act of 2022 that is allocated for purposes of this section shall be available for encumbrance until June 30, 2024.

(b) (1) The process and tools developed by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include immediate identification, further evaluation as needed, support and remediation based on needs of the child, and additional referrals for services as deemed necessary.

(2) A process for research-based early intervention that considers the differing intervention needs children may have in areas of concern.

(3) Evidence that the process and tools are valid and reliable for identification of all delays pursuant to Part B of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), including, but not limited to, dyslexia and other early literacy delays, and for identification of literacy and language acquisition for children two to six years of age, inclusive, who speak a home language that is not English.

(4) Communication approaches with parents and guardians to address student supports in the home learning environment.

(c) The process and tools developed by the department pursuant to
 subdivision (a) shall be available and appropriate for use in all California state preschool programs, transitional kindergarten programs, and kindergarten programs pursuant to guidance from the Superintendent.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and Section 33308.5, until regulations are filed with the Secretary of State to implement this subdivision, the department shall implement this subdivision through management bulletins or similar letters of instruction no later than six months after the process and tools determination is complete.

(2) The department shall initiate a rulemaking action to implement this subdivision within one calendar year of the management bulletin being released.

(e) On or before October 5, 2023, the department shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, appropriate policy committees of the Legislature, and the Department of Finance to identify the process and tools developed pursuant to this section, the evidence required pursuant to this section, and recommendations to align local practices and implementation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 62, Sec. 14.   (AB 210)   Effective June 30, 2022.   See same-numbered Art. 24 as added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 915.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Adult Education [8500. - 8538.]



  ARTICLE 1. Legislative Intent [8500. - 8500.]

8500.

The Legislature finds and declares that adult continuing education is essential to the needs of society in an era of rapid technological, economic, and social change and that all adults in California are entitled to quality publicly supported continuing education opportunity, including the following:

(a) The opportunity to acquire the knowledge and skills necessary to participate effectively in today’s economy and society.

(b) Access to courses at the postsecondary level that are foundations upon which successive academic or occupational knowledge are dependent.

(c) Participation in other courses designed to meet the particular needs of the local community.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [8510. - 8510.]

8510.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions set forth in this section govern the construction of this chapter.

(a) “Adult basic education” is education in communication and computational skills to and including the 12th grade level, including English as a second language and citizenship.

(b) “Classes for adults” are classes without a college grade level designation organized primarily for persons 18 years of age or older.

(c) “Course approval” is the process of approval by either the State Department of Education or the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges. 

(d) “Mutual agreement” means an agreement between two or more governing boards of districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 72.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Functions of Continuing Education Programs [8530. - 8538.]

8530.

Adult basic education is the responsibility of high school and unified school districts except in those instances where by mutual agreement the responsibility is assigned to a community college district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

8531.

The high school diploma program is the responsibility of the high school and unified school districts, but courses leading to a high school diploma may be offered by a community college district pursuant to a mutual agreement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

8532.

Vocational and occupational training and retraining programs for adults may be made available in high school, unified, and community college districts by mutual agreement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

8533.

Adult continuing education, including but not limited to, parent education, consumer education, civic education, education in special fields, and education in the arts and the humanities, may be made available in high school, unified, and community college districts by mutual agreement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

8534.

Programs for adults involving postsecondary programs that meet the standards prescribed by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges for credit and noncredit courses are the responsibility of community college districts.
